Utah statutes.
34A-11-102.   Restrictions on employers.

With respect to matters related to genetic testing and private genetic information, an employer shall comply with Section 26-45-103 and the other applicable provisions of Title 26, Chapter 45, Genetic Testing Privacy Act.

